Illinois, session 104th, HB624.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Home 5for Good Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. 7    (a) The General Assembly recognizes the following: 8        (1) The Illinois prison system releases 15,000 people 9    each year, but without a cogent and unified statewide 10    system to support housing security and reduce the risk of 11    recidivism. 12        (2) A 2025 Loyola University Chicago Study found that 13    between 66% and 80% of individuals incarcerated in the 14    Illinois Department of Corrections experienced housing 15    instability or homelessness within 3 years prior to their 16    incarceration, making them at risk of homelessness after 17    prison as well.18        (3) Returning residents often struggle to access 19    housing and stable jobs because of State laws and policies 20    that permit housing discrimination against people with 21    records. For example, the Illinois Human Rights Act only 22    protects people with arrest records from housing-related 23    discrimination, but offers no such protections to persons   HB0624 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1    with conviction records.2        (4) The current U.S. Department of Housing and Urban 3    Development policy on homelessness also creates barriers 4    that prevent formerly incarcerated individuals from 5    accessing permanent housing programs through the homeless 6    system.7        (5) A 2023 study of the Illinois Criminal Justice 8    Information Authority found that formerly incarcerated 9    people have an average unemployment rate of 45% and lower 10    annual wages, with Black individuals who are formerly 11    incarcerated having the highest rates of unemployment.12        (6) As a result, many people cannot comply with the 13    conditions of release, or they turn to the underground 14    economy to support themselves and their families. 15        (7) Research shows that housing instability, 16    homelessness, unemployment, and low wages are among the 17    factors that contribute to the nearly 40% of previously 18    incarcerated people returning to prison within 3 years.19        (8) According to a Spring 2025 Illinois Sentencing 20    Policy Advisory Council report, Illinois taxpayers already 21    pay $89,408 annually for each person incarcerated in State 22    prisons.23        (9) When a person returns to prison, the total cost 24    rises to $200,000, including direct and indirect costs, 25    resulting in unnecessary and expensive costs for all 26    Illinoisans.  HB0624 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1        (10) The State government has a responsibility to 2    increase community safety and individual and family 3    well-being by addressing the housing needs of persons 4    leaving incarceration.5        (11) Affordable, safe, and stable housing is a 6    fundamental necessity for successful reentry and family 7    stability.8        (12) Affordable, safe, and stable housing for 9    returning residents also improves and promotes public 10    safety.11        (13) Without a dedicated commitment of affordable, 12    safe, and stable housing providing a mix of transitional 13    and permanent affordable housing that is informed by the 14    housing needs and policy perspectives of returning 15    residents, the State is failing to meet the needs of its 16    residents and communities. 17    (b) The General Assembly also recognizes that there are 18several independent strategies in place now that increase 19access to safe, affordable housing for returning residents and 20improve and promote public safety, including:21        (1) The Illinois Housing Development Authority (IHDA), 22    as administrator of the Rental Housing Support Program, 23    created the Re-Entry Program, providing 81 Reentry Rental 24    Housing Support Program subsidies across the State with 25    the support of housing navigators who build relationships 26    with landlords and connect returning residents to   HB0624 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1    resources to support their success.2        (2) IHDA's Housing for Justice Involved Individuals 3    Program provides grants to community-based organizations 4    to acquire, build, or rehabilitate housing for the purpose 5    of creating transitional reentry housing beds across the 6    State, resulting in over 500 beds statewide.7        (3) IHDA's Housing Task Force added "justice-involved 8    individuals" as a priority population for IHDA's 2026 9    Annual Comprehensive Housing Plan.10        (4) The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act created the 11    Restore, Reinvest, and Renew (R3) program, which reinvests 12    a portion of cannabis tax revenue into communities in 13    order to reduce gun violence through intervention and 14    prevention, improve reentry and diversion services for 15    people involved with the criminal justice system, provide 16    access to legal representation and advice, encourage 17    investment and economic growth, enhance youth development, 18    and support programs that improve the social determinants 19    of health.20        (5) Through the 2026 R3 Notice of Funding Opportunity 21    (CSFA Number 546-00-2378), the Illinois Criminal Justice 22    Information Authority and the R3 Board have committed up 23    to $35,000,000 as a set aside for reentry services, civil 24    legal aid services, and economic development in order to 25    provide returning residents with support and economic 26    opportunities.   HB0624 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1    (c) It is the intent of the General Assembly to codify into 2law a comprehensive and unified statewide reentry program 3incorporating the existing reentry programs of the Illinois 4Housing Development Authority and the Illinois Criminal 5Justice Information Authority that: 6        (1) will meet a returning resident's housing needs and 7    is community-based;8        (2) includes ongoing active involvement by formerly 9    incarcerated persons;10        (3) provides a mix of transitional and permanent 11    affordable housing units, rental subsidies, and reentry 12    services supported by sustained and adequate funding; and13        (4) will have a positive long-term return on 14    investment for this State.  15    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act: 16    "Advisory Committee" means the Home for Good Advisory 17Committee.18    "Community-based organizations" means non-profit 19organizations delivering housing and other services to those 20reentering from incarceration and who are eligible to receive 21grants from Illinois state agencies.22    "ICJIA" means the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 23Authority.24    "IDOC" means the Illinois Department of Corrections.25    "IHDA" means the Illinois Housing Development Authority.  HB0624 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1    "Institute" means the Home for Good Institute. 2    "Program" means the Home for Good Program. 3    "Targeted population" means persons released from an IDOC 4facility on or after January 1, 2027 who shall be eligible to 5enroll in the Program for up to 5 years from their release 6date.  7    Section 15. Home for Good Program. The Home for Good 8Program is created as a statewide coordinated program designed 9to provide housing and services to the targeted population. 10The Program shall contain the following elements:11        (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, IHDA shall be 12    responsible for providing appropriate resources to 13    potential applicants to acquire, develop, and rehabilitate 14    permanent affordable housing units and transitional 15    housing units that are designated exclusively for the 16    targeted population. The granting and application process 17    shall follow the existing program model of the Housing for 18    Justice Involved Individuals Program. IHDA shall also be 19    responsible for providing site-based rental housing 20    subsidies to community-based organizations that work with 21    the targeted population which may be used to enter into 22    lease agreements and master lease agreements for the 23    purpose of providing housing for program participants and 24    tenant-based rental subsidies.25        (2) Beginning January 1, 2027, ICJIA shall provide   HB0624 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1    appropriate resources to community-based organizations who 2    work with the targeted population. These resources shall 3    be used to provide case management and reentry navigation 4    services to Program participants. In addition, these 5    resources shall be used to make supportive services 6    available to Program participants. Services may include 7    housing and related services, physical and behavioral 8    health, education, family reunification and relationship 9    building, transportation, job training, acquiring vital 10    documents, and meeting basic needs.11        (3) Beginning January 1, 2027, the Executive Director 12    of ICJIA shall ensure that regional networks of 13    participating community-based organizations and housing 14    providers are established for the Program to collaborate 15    and provide services and housing to the targeted 16    population.17        (4) Beginning January 1, 2027, the Program shall 18    require that a housing needs assessment tool designed to 19    determine housing and support services needs is 20    administered to all individuals who are exiting IDOC 21    custody within the next 12 to 18 months. At least 18 months 22    prior to their release date, individuals must be informed 23    of the housing needs assessment tool and their right to 24    opt out of participation. IDOC shall make all reasonable 25    efforts to ensure that all individuals who do not opt out 26    of participation are able to complete the housing needs   HB0624 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1    assessment. The assessment shall be administered by a 2    community-based organization with demonstrable expertise 3    in reentry services, behavioral health, and permanent and 4    transitional affordable housing which shall be given no 5    less than monthly access to IDOC facilities for the 6    purposes of administering the housing needs assessment 7    tool and conducting prerelease reentry planning and 8    service delivery. For individuals exiting IDOC prior to 9    the completion of the housing needs assessment tool, IDOC 10    shall provide the contact information for the 11    community-based organizations administering the housing 12    needs assessment tool. Community-based organizations 13    administering the housing needs assessment tool shall make 14    all reasonable efforts to complete the tool for 15    individuals who have already exited IDOC. The housing 16    needs assessment shall determine an individual's 17    vulnerability to housing instability or homelessness, and 18    the assessment shall identify the individual's behavioral 19    health needs. The purpose of the behavioral health element 20    of the assessment is to help potential participants 21    successfully secure housing and shall not be used as a 22    reason to exclude potential participants from the Program.23        (5) The Interagency Reentry Workgroup shall be created 24    and designed to serve the housing and support services 25    needs of the targeted population by implementing and 26    coordinating the activities of the Program among the State   HB0624 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1    agencies involved. The Workgroup's activities shall be 2    informed by people who have experienced reentry. The 3    Workgroup shall be chaired by the Executive Director of 4    ICJIA or his or her designee. Members of the Workgroup 5    shall include the Director of IDOC, or his or her 6    designee, and the Executive Director of IHDA, or his or 7    her designee. The chair may add other agency leaders or 8    their designees to the Workgroup as needed.9        (6) On January 1, 2027, or as soon thereafter as 10    reasonably possible, the Executive Director of IHDA shall 11    create the Home for Good Institute. The Home for Good 12    Institute shall provide training and technical assistance 13    to community-based organizations who intend to acquire, 14    develop, rehabilitate, or operate permanent and 15    transitional housing units for the targeted population. 16    Community-based organizations that successfully complete 17    the training from the Institute shall be awarded 18    additional points on any applications for funding from 19    IHDA, including the Home for Good Program.20        (7) The Home for Good Advisory Committee is created 21    for the purposes of identifying program priorities and 22    making recommendations for approval to ICJIA's and IHDA's 23    governing boards to foster collaboration between ICJIA and 24    IHDA and between these State agencies and community-based 25    organizations, and to ensure the equitable provision of 26    resources for affordable housing and support services   HB0624 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1    throughout the State based upon the geographic 2    distribution of incarcerated people exiting IDOC. The 3    Advisory Committee shall be housed at ICJIA. The Executive 4    Director of ICJIA shall appoint Advisory Committee 5    members, not to exceed 25. Members of the Advisory 6    Committee shall include:7            (A) the Executive Director of ICJIA or his or her 8        designee;9            (B) the Executive Director of IHDA or his or her 10        designee; 11            (C) the Director of IDOC or his or her designee;12            (D) the Reentry Director at the Department of 13        Human Services or his or her designee;14            (E) the Director of Reentry for the City of 15        Chicago or his or her designee;16            (F) the Executive Director of the Illinois 17        Sentencing Policy Advisory Council or his or her 18        designee;19            (G) the Chief Homelessness Officer or his or her 20        designee;21            (H) 5 reentry advocates, at least 3 of whom must be 22        previously incarcerated; however, advocates who are 23        officers, members, or employees of entities that 24        receive money through the Program are not eligible for 25        appointment to the Advisory Committee;26            (I) one representative of an affordable housing   HB0624 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1        development organization;2            (J) one representative of an affordable housing 3        advocacy organization;4            (K) one reentry researcher;5            (L) 5 community members with proportional 6        representation from urban, suburban, and rural areas 7        throughout the State; and 8            (M) one person each appointed by: 9                (i) the President of the Senate; 10                (ii) the Minority Leader of the Senate; 11                (iii) the Speaker of the House of 12            Representatives; and 13                (iv) the Minority Leader of the House of 14            Representatives. 15        At least 5 of the up to 25 members appointed to the 16    Advisory Committee by the Executive Director of ICJIA 17    shall have personally experienced incarceration and 18    reentry.19        (8) No later than January 31, 2028, and every January 20    31 thereafter, the Home for Good Advisory Committee, 21    subject to approval by ICJIA's and IHDA's governing 22    boards, shall annually submit to the General Assembly and 23    the Governor a public report containing data for the prior 24    State fiscal year on the number of persons served, the 25    effectiveness of the Program as measured by criteria 26    established by the Advisory Committee, the amount and type   HB0624 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1    of housing made available through the Program, metrics on 2    the Program's waitlist such as demographics, size and 3    average waiting time, metrics on the number and percentage 4    of individuals who completed a housing needs assessment 5    compared to the number and percentage of individuals 6    eligible to receive that housing needs assessment, data 7    and information about why individuals chose to opt out of 8    the housing needs assessment, the return on investment 9    generated through savings and economic activity resulting 10    from the implementation of the Program, a forecast of the 11    number of people exiting State prisons who are at risk of 12    experiencing housing instability and homelessness each 13    fiscal year, any recommended improvements to the Program's 14    design, and a forecast of the number of affordable homes 15    needed to meet the needs of Program participants. 16    Section 20. Rules. IHDA, ICJIA, and IDOC shall jointly 17adopt rules to implement this Act. The rules must describe how 18a housing needs assessment will be administered by 19community-based organizations with expertise in providing 20reentry services and permanent and transitional housing to 21persons incarcerated in IDOC no later than 12 months prior to 22their release date. 23    The rules must describe how a housing needs assessment 24will make the determinations described in paragraph (3) of 25Section 15.   HB0624 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 04511 KTG 14538 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.